src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-xadasjTS_gt-norm.yaml
     хадась+V+TV+Prec+Opt+ScPl3+OcPl3: хадахаръядамдоʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScSg1+OcSg3: [хадасятыв, хадасетыв]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScSg2+OcSg3: [хадасятыр, хадасетыр]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScSg3+OcSg3: [хадасятыда, хадасетыда]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScDu1+OcSg3: [хадасятымиʼ, хадасетымиʼ]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScDu2+OcSg3: [хадасятыриʼ, хадасетыриʼ]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScDu3+OcSg3: [хадасятыдиʼ, хадасетыдиʼ]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScPl1+OcSg3: [хадасятываˮ, хадасетываˮ]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScPl2+OcSg3: [хадасятыраˮ, хадасетыраˮ]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScPl3+OcSg3: [хадасятыдоʼ, хадасетыдоʼ]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScSg1+OcDu3: [хадасятыхыюн, хадасетыхыюн]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScSg2+OcDu3: [хадасятыхыюд, хадасетыхыюд]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScSg3+OcDu3: [хадасятыхыюда, хадасетыхыюда]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScDu1+OcDu3: [хадасятыхыюниʼ, хадасетыхыюниʼ]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScDu2+OcDu3: [хадасятыхыюдиʼ, хадасетыхыюдиʼ]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScDu3+OcDu3: [хадасятыхыюдиʼ, хадасетыхыюдиʼ]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScPl1+OcDu3: [хадасятыхыюнаˮ, хадасетыхыюнаˮ]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScPl2+OcDu3: [хадасятыхыюдаˮ, хадасетыхыюдаˮ]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScPl3+OcDu3: [хадасятыхыюдоʼ, хадасетыхыюдоʼ]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScSg1+OcPl3: [хадасятын, хадасетын]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScSg2+OcPl3: [хадасятыд, хадасетыд]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScSg3+OcPl3: [хадасятыда, хадасетыда]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScDu1+OcPl3: [хадасятыниʼ, хадасетыниʼ]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScDu2+OcPl3: [хадасятыдиʼ, хадасетыдиʼ]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScDu3+OcPl3: [хадасятыдиʼ, хадасетыдиʼ]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScPl1+OcPl3: [хадасятынаˮ, хадасетынаˮ]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScPl2+OcPl3: [хадасятыдаˮ, хадасетыдаˮ]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScPl3+OcPl3: [хадасятыдоʼ, хадасетыдоʼ]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScSg1+OcSg3: [хадасятвэв, хадасетвэв]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScSg2+OcSg3: [хадасятвэр, хадасетвэр]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScSg3+OcSg3: [хадасятвэда, хадасетвэда]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScDu1+OcSg3: [хадасятвэмиʼ, хадасетвэмиʼ]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScDu2+OcSg3: [хадасятвэриʼ, хадасетвэриʼ]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScDu3+OcSg3: [хадасятвэдиʼ, хадасетвэдиʼ]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScPl1+OcSg3: [хадасятвэваˮ, хадасетвэваˮ]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScPl2+OcSg3: [хадасятвэраˮ, хадасетвэраˮ]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScPl3+OcSg3: [хадасятвэдоʼ, хадасетвэдоʼ]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScSg1+OcDu3: [хадасятвэхэюн, хадасетвэхэюн]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScSg2+OcDu3: [хадасятвэхэюд, хадасетвэхэюд]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScSg3+OcDu3: [хадасятвэхэюда, хадасетвэхэюда]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScDu1+OcDu3: [хадасятвэхэюниʼ, хадасетвэхэюниʼ]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScDu2+OcDu3: [хадасятвэхэюдиʼ, хадасетвэхэюдиʼ]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScDu3+OcDu3: [хадасятвэхэюдиʼ, хадасетвэхэюдиʼ]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScPl1+OcDu3: [хадасятвэхэюнаˮ, хадасетвэхэюнаˮ]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScPl2+OcDu3: [хадасятвэхэюдаˮ, хадасетвэхэюдаˮ]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScPl3+OcDu3: [хадасятвэхэюдоʼ, хадасетвэхэюдоʼ]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScSg1+OcPl3: [хадасятвын, хадасетвын]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScSg2+OcPl3: [хадасятвыд, хадасетвыд]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScSg3+OcPl3: [хадасятвыда, хадасетвыда]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScDu1+OcPl3: [хадасятвыниʼ, хадасетвыниʼ]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScDu2+OcPl3: [хадасятвыдиʼ, хадасетвыдиʼ]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScDu3+OcPl3: [хадасятвыдиʼ, хадасетвыдиʼ]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScPl1+OcPl3: [хадасятвынаˮ, хадасетвынаˮ]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScPl2+OcPl3: [хадасятвыдаˮ, хадасетвыдаˮ]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScPl3+OcPl3: [хадасятвыдоʼ, хадасетвыдоʼ]
